South Dakota, session 2026, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-27:
The board of a school district may adopt a policy that allows for the admission of a
child younger than five to the district's kindergarten program if the child:
(1) Is to turn five after September first and before December October first of the year
the child is admitted to the kindergarten program; and
(2) Demonstrates the cognitive and social skills necessary to meet the kindergarten
standards and progress to first grade the following year.
Any policy adopted by the board pursuant to this section must describe the process
and the procedures by which the district evaluates a child's cognitive and social skills.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-28:
The parent or guardian of a child younger than five may apply, pursuant to § 13-
28-43, to enroll the child in a school district other than the child's resident district if the
child's resident district has not adopted a policy allowing for the admission of children
younger than five to the district's kindergarten program pursuant to section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. That § 13-28-41 be AMENDED:
13-28-41. A school district shall grant a request for a transfer into the district or
within the district unless the transfer would result in an inability to provide a quality
educational program based on criteria established by the district pursuant to § 13-28-44.
In addition, a school district shall grant a request to admit into the district a child
who is a resident of another school district and who is excused from attending school in
the resident district pursuant to § 13-27-2, or is a child provided with alternative
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1282A 2 1282
instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3, unless admitting the nonresident child would result in
an inability to provide a quality educational program based on criteria established by the
district pursuant to § 13-28-44.
A school district must grant the application of a parent or guardian to transfer a
child under the control of the parent or guardian into the district or within the district if
admitting the child does not result in the district's inability to provide a quality educational
program based on the criteria established by the district pursuant to § 13-28-44, and the
child is:
(1) Excused from attending school in the child's resident district pursuant to § 13-27-
2;
(2) Provided with alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3; or
(3) Admitted to the school district's kindergarten program under the policy adopted by
the board of the school district pursuant to section 1 of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.